text_files/mi_NZ.aff
###############################
# Māori affix file - Creation #
#### 29 Aug 2016, 17:59:58 ####
##### pangakupu@gmail.com #####
###############################

######################
#### part 1 of 5 #####
### General Options ##
######################

##### set #####
SET UTF-8
### end set ###

##### flag #####
FLAG num
### end flag ###

##############################
######## part 2 of 5 #########
### Options for suggestion ###
##############################

##### key #####
KEY qwertyuiop|asdfghjkl|zxcvbnm
### end key ###

##### nosplitsugs #####
NOSPLITSUGS
### end nosplitsugs ###

##### rep #####
REP 21
REP a ā
REP ā a
REP e ē
REP ē e
REP i ī
REP ī i
REP o ō
REP ō o
REP u ū
REP ū u
REP aa ā
REP ā aa
REP ee ē
REP ē ee
REP ii ī
REP ī ii
REP oo ō
REP ō oo
REP uu ū
REP ū uu
REP metemea me_te_mea
### end rep ###

##### map #####
MAP 5
MAP aā
MAP eē
MAP iī
MAP oō
MAP uū
### end map ###

################################
######### part 3 of 5 ##########
### Options for comppounding ###
################################

##### break #####
BREAK 0
### end break ###

########################
##### part 4 of 5 ######
### regular suffixes ###
########################

##### 001 of 140 #####
SFX 1 N 1
SFX 1 0 a
### end 001 of 140 ###

##### 002 of 140 #####
SFX 2 N 1
SFX 2 0 ā
### end 002 of 140 ###

##### 003 of 140 #####
SFX 3 N 1
SFX 3 0 anga
### end 003 of 140 ###

##### 004 of 140 #####
SFX 4 N 1
SFX 4 0 hanga
### end 004 of 140 ###

##### 005 of 140 #####
SFX 5 N 1
SFX 5 0 hia
### end 005 of 140 ###

##### 006 of 140 #####
SFX 6 N 1
SFX 6 0 ia
### end 006 of 140 ###

##### 007 of 140 #####
SFX 7 N 1
SFX 7 0 ina
### end 007 of 140 ###

##### 008 of 140 #####
SFX 8 N 1
SFX 8 0 inga
### end 008 of 140 ###

##### 009 of 140 #####
SFX 9 N 1
SFX 9 0 kanga
### end 009 of 140 ###

##### 010 of 140 #####
SFX 10 N 1
SFX 10 0 kia
### end 010 of 140 ###

##### 011 of 140 #####
SFX 11 N 1
SFX 11 0 kina
### end 011 of 140 ###

##### 012 of 140 #####
SFX 12 N 1
SFX 12 0 manga
### end 012 of 140 ###

##### 013 of 140 #####
SFX 13 N 1
SFX 13 0 mia
### end 013 of 140 ###

##### 014 of 140 #####
SFX 14 N 1
SFX 14 0 na
### end 014 of 140 ###

##### 015 of 140 #####
SFX 15 N 1
SFX 15 0 nga
### end 015 of 140 ###

##### 016 of 140 #####
SFX 16 N 1
SFX 16 0 ngia
### end 016 of 140 ###

##### 017 of 140 #####
SFX 17 N 1
SFX 17 0 ranga
### end 017 of 140 ###

##### 018 of 140 #####
SFX 18 N 1
SFX 18 0 ria
### end 018 of 140 ###

##### 019 of 140 #####
SFX 19 N 1
SFX 19 0 tanga
### end 019 of 140 ###

##### 020 of 140 #####
SFX 20 N 1
SFX 20 0 tia
### end 020 of 140 ###

##### 021 of 140 #####
SFX 21 N 1
SFX 21 0 unga
### end 021 of 140 ###

##### 022 of 140 #####
SFX 22 N 1
SFX 22 0 whia
### end 022 of 140 ###

##### 023 of 140 #####
SFX 23 N 1
SFX 23 0 whina
### end 023 of 140 ###

########################
##### part 5 of 5 ######
## irregular suffixes ##
########################

##### fullstrip #####
FULLSTRIP
### end fullstrip ###

########### 024 of 140 ###########
SFX 24 N 1
SFX 24 ārahi arahina .
######### end 024 of 140 #########

########### 025 of 140 ###########
SFX 25 N 1
SFX 25 awhe awheawhea .
######### end 025 of 140 #########

########### 026 of 140 ###########
SFX 26 N 1
SFX 26 haka hakā .
######### end 026 of 140 #########

########### 027 of 140 ###########
SFX 27 N 1
SFX 27 hanga hangā .
######### end 027 of 140 #########

########### 028 of 140 ###########
SFX 28 N 1
SFX 28 hiki hīkina .
######### end 028 of 140 #########

########### 029 of 140 ###########
SFX 29 N 1
SFX 29 hīpoki hipokina .
######### end 029 of 140 #########

########### 030 of 140 ###########
SFX 30 N 1
SFX 30 homai homai .
######### end 030 of 140 #########

########### 031 of 140 ###########
SFX 31 N 1
SFX 31 hōmai hōmai .
######### end 031 of 140 #########

########### 032 of 140 ###########
SFX 32 N 1
SFX 32 horomi horomanga .
######### end 032 of 140 #########

########### 033 of 140 ###########
SFX 33 N 1
SFX 33 huti hūtia .
######### end 033 of 140 #########

########### 034 of 140 ###########
SFX 34 N 1
SFX 34 kairiri kairīria .
######### end 034 of 140 #########

########### 035 of 140 ###########
SFX 35 N 1
SFX 35 kakati katia .
######### end 035 of 140 #########

########### 036 of 140 ###########
SFX 36 N 1
SFX 36 kanga kangā .
######### end 036 of 140 #########

########### 037 of 140 ###########
SFX 37 N 1
SFX 37 keuea keuenga .
######### end 037 of 140 #########

########### 038 of 140 ###########
SFX 38 N 1
SFX 38 kokopi kopia .
######### end 038 of 140 #########

########### 039 of 140 ###########
SFX 39 N 2
SFX 39 kokoti kotia .
SFX 39 kokoti kotinga .
######### end 039 of 140 #########

########### 040 of 140 ###########
SFX 40 N 2
SFX 40 kukume kumea .
SFX 40 kukume kumenga .
######### end 040 of 140 #########

########### 041 of 140 ###########
SFX 41 N 2
SFX 41 kukuti kutanga .
SFX 41 kukuti kūtia .
######### end 041 of 140 #########

########### 042 of 140 ###########
SFX 42 N 1
SFX 42 kume kūmea .
######### end 042 of 140 #########

########### 043 of 140 ###########
SFX 43 N 2
SFX 43 kuti kutanga .
SFX 43 kuti kūtia .
######### end 043 of 140 #########

########### 044 of 140 ###########
SFX 44 N 1
SFX 44 maka makā .
######### end 044 of 140 #########

########### 045 of 140 ###########
SFX 45 N 1
SFX 45 maoa maonga .
######### end 045 of 140 #########

########### 046 of 140 ###########
SFX 46 N 1
SFX 46 māoa maonga .
######### end 046 of 140 #########

########### 047 of 140 ###########
SFX 47 N 1
SFX 47 mea meinga .
######### end 047 of 140 #########

########### 048 of 140 ###########
SFX 48 N 1
SFX 48 mimi mīia .
######### end 048 of 140 #########

########### 049 of 140 ###########
SFX 49 N 1
SFX 49 mimire mirea .
######### end 049 of 140 #########

########### 050 of 140 ###########
SFX 50 N 1
SFX 50 momotu motuhia .
######### end 050 of 140 #########

########### 051 of 140 ###########
SFX 51 N 2
SFX 51 nanao naomanga .
SFX 51 nanao naomia .
######### end 051 of 140 #########

########### 052 of 140 ###########
SFX 52 N 1
SFX 52 nanati nātia .
######### end 052 of 140 #########

########### 053 of 140 ###########
SFX 53 N 1
SFX 53 nanatu nātua .
######### end 053 of 140 #########

########### 054 of 140 ###########
SFX 54 N 1
SFX 54 nati nātia .
######### end 054 of 140 #########

########### 055 of 140 ###########
SFX 55 N 1
SFX 55 noho nōhia .
######### end 055 of 140 #########

########### 056 of 140 ###########
SFX 56 N 1
SFX 56 nuka nukaia .
######### end 056 of 140 #########

########### 057 of 140 ###########
SFX 57 N 1
SFX 57 pae pāea .
######### end 057 of 140 #########

########### 058 of 140 ###########
SFX 58 N 1
SFX 58 paki pākia .
######### end 058 of 140 #########

########### 059 of 140 ###########
SFX 59 N 1
SFX 59 panga pangā .
######### end 059 of 140 #########

########### 060 of 140 ###########
SFX 60 N 1
SFX 60 pēhi pēhanga .
######### end 060 of 140 #########

########### 061 of 140 ###########
SFX 61 N 1
SFX 61 pēpēhi pēhanga .
######### end 061 of 140 #########

########### 062 of 140 ###########
SFX 62 N 1
SFX 62 pepeke pekenga .
######### end 062 of 140 #########

########### 063 of 140 ###########
SFX 63 N 1
SFX 63 pīpī pīia .
######### end 063 of 140 #########

########### 064 of 140 ###########
SFX 64 N 1
SFX 64 pipiha pihanga .
######### end 064 of 140 #########

########### 065 of 140 ###########
SFX 65 N 1
SFX 65 poki pōkia .
######### end 065 of 140 #########

########### 066 of 140 ###########
SFX 66 N 1
SFX 66 popohe pohenga .
######### end 066 of 140 #########

########### 067 of 140 ###########
SFX 67 N 1
SFX 67 popoki popōkia .
######### end 067 of 140 #########

########### 068 of 140 ###########
SFX 68 N 1
SFX 68 popoko pokonga .
######### end 068 of 140 #########

########### 069 of 140 ###########
SFX 69 N 1
SFX 69 puke pukea .
######### end 069 of 140 #########

########### 070 of 140 ###########
SFX 70 N 1
SFX 70 pupuha puhanga .
######### end 070 of 140 #########
