text_files/mi_NZ.dic
ao/4,5,15,19,20,22
āpiti/1,4,5,15,16,17,18,19,20
apu/4,5,15,18,19,20
ārahi/4,15,19,20,24
ārohi/1,4,5,15,19,20
aruaru/12,13,15,16
aumihi/1,4,5,15,16,19,20
awhe/1,4,5,15,16,19,20,25
awhi/4,5,16,19,20
ene/1,4,5,15
haha/7,15,16,20
hāhau/17,18
haipū/17,18,19
haka/7,15,19,20,26
hakuturi/19
hanga/6,15,27
hāpara/6,19,20
harapaki/1,14,15,19
hāro/1,15,19
hāupaupa/4,5,7,15,19,20
haurapa/7,15,19,20
haurokuroku/15
hēru/1,15,16,19,20
hiainu/12
hiato/4,17
hihī/3
hīkaro/1,5,15
hiki/14,15,19,20,28
hīpoki/15,19,29
hoa/6,7,15
hohore/1,16,19
hoka/6,7,15
homai/5,15,16,19,20,30
hōmai/5,16,19,20,31
hopu/1,9,10,11,15,16,17,19
hopuhopu/1,9,11,15,16
hora/4,5,7,15
horomi/1,19,32
hōtiki/14,15
hoto/1,15,16
hou/1,4,5,15,19,20
hua/3,6,7,15
hurutete/15
huti/1,15,33
inu/12,13,19
kā/8,15
kaea/4,15
kāhaki/14,15,19,20
kaiponu/5,15,19,20
kairiri/15,20,34
kaitu/17
kakati/1,15,35
kāmura/4,5
kanga/4,5,36
kāpui/1,15,19,20
karaepaepa/4,5,7,15,20
karapetapeta/4
katoha/7,15,19,20
kau/3,15,17,18,19,20
kauoro/12,13,19,20
kēkēao/15,19
kekeno/4,19
kemo/5,15,16,19,20
keuea/37
kī/3,6,15
kiato/4,17
kiha/3,15,19
kini/1,4,5,19,20
koa/6,7,15
kōaro/4,15,19
kohete/4,5,16,19,20
kohinu/1,12,13,19,20
kohura/7,15,19
kōkī/3,19
kokopi/15,19,38
kokororiki/19
kokoti/1,15,19,39
kōmou/1,15
kōmukumuku/1,14,15,19,20
kōpāpā/9,19
korepe/9,10,15,16,19,20
kōreperepe/1,5,9,10,15,16,19,20
korita/4,15
koroiti/15
koropana/5,6,15
korowhiti/1,4,5,15,16
kotiri/1,5,15,19
koto/4,5,15,16,17,18,19,20
kotokoto/15,17
koutu/4,15,19
kukume/1,20,40
kukuti/15,41
kumanu/1,15,16,19,20
kume/1,15,19,42
kunanu/12,19
kunene/3,20
kuoro/4,5,12,13,19,20
kurukuru/1,15,16,19,20
kuti/15,43
māhī/3,15
maka/6,15,44
makitaunu/12,13
mamahu/14,15,19,20
mamau/17,18
manawapā/9,15
manomano/15,19
māngoingoi/5,19,20
maoa/5,19,20,45
māoa/19,46
mārui/2,15
matakēkē/15,16,19,20
mātaki/14,15
matatoua/3,15
mātau/5,17,18
mau/1,15,17,18,19,21
mea/5,15,19,20,47
mimi/5,15,48
mimire/1,15,19,20,49
momoto/9,10
momotu/5,15,16,50
mono/1,10,15,19
motatau/15,17
moto/1,9,10,15
motomoto/1,9,10,15
nanao/51
nanati/1,15,19,52
nanatu/1,15,19,53
nati/15,54
nere/15
niwaniwa/5,19,20
noho/6,15,16,55
nuka/19,56
nuku/4,5,15
ngaehe/19
ngaro/12,15,20
ngita/6,15,19
ngūngū/17,18
omaki/14,15
ono/9,10
pā/6,10,15,16,20
pae/1,15,57
paki/14,15,58
pakirara/7,15,19,20
panga/6,15,59
papare/1,15,19
paritū/15,17
pātukituki/1,15
pēhi/1,15,16,19,20,60
pepehatū/5,15,16
pēpēhi/5,15,19,20,61
pepeke/62
pīhao/1,15,16
pīnganga/19
pīpī/15,19,63
pipiha/19,64
poka/6,7,15
poki/15,65
popohe/15,66
popoki/15,67
popoko/68
popore/1,15,19,20
pōuto/1,10,15
pūanu/12,13
pūkai/15,17,18,19,20
puke/15,69
pūmau/17,19
pupuha/19,70
raka/7,15
ranu/1,5,13,15,20
rangirangi/1,4,5,19,20
rauora/5,15,16,19,20
rī/3,6
riaka/15,18
riaki/14,15,19
ringiringi/1,5,20,88
riripi/15,19
rōpā/5,15,19,20
takihakohako/14,15
tāmou/1,15,19
tanu/12,13
tapa/6,7,15,16
tāpara/5,15,16,19,20
tāpatu/1,15,16,19,20
tāranu/12,13,19,20
tārenga/19,20
tātā/6,9,10,11,15,20
tātaki/14,15
tatau/16,17,18,111
tau/1,15,17
tauaru/12,13
tautapa/7,15,19,20
tautohe/1,15,19,20
tautoko/14,19,20
tīhohehohe/15
tīpakopako/5,14,15,19,20
tīpoka/5,6,15,18,19,20
tito/1,6,15,16
tītongitongi/19,20
tīwaha/5,15,19,20
tohu/1,7,15,16,19,20
tomo/9,10
totohi/1,15,20
tuku/1,14,15
tūpapahū/15,19
tūpore/1,15,19,20
turapana/5,6,15,20
tuwha/7,15,19,20
unu/1,4,5,12,13,15
urutomo/9,10
waituhi/1,15,19,20
wete/1,9,10,11,15
wetewete/1,9,10,11,15
wewete/1,9,10,11,15
whāinu/12,13
whakaara/5,15,16,19,20
whakaatu/5,16,17,18
whakahī/3,6,15
whakahiwa/6,15,19,20
whakahoahoa/7,15,16,19,20
whakainu/12,13
whakakapi/1,15,16
whakamahine/19,20
whakamārō/5,10,16,19,20
whakamate/1,15,16
whakamatora/5,16,19
whakamau/1,15
whakangaro/12,13,15
whakangawhi/19,20
whakapīoraora/5,15,16,19,20
whakapō/10,15,16,19
whakapuare/16,19,20
whakaputa/5,7,15,16
whakaranu/5,12,13,19,20
whakarapou/19,20
whakarōriki/14,19,20
whakatito/1,6,15,16
whakatupu/1,15,16,17,18
whakawehe/1,15,16
whano/15
whao/1,14,15,16,18,22,23
whāranu/1,12,13
whārite/1,5,15,16
whāunu/12,13,19,20
whawharo/1,15,16
whawhau/1,15,19,20,22
wheinu/12,19
whiti/1,11,15,16
whītiki/17,18
